Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.040

Exemptions from chapter.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) An individual who holds a credential issued by this state, other than as a certified peer specialist or certified peer specialist trainee, to engage in the practice of an occupation or profession without obtaining an additional credential from the state. The individual may not use the title certified peer specialist unless the individual holds a credential under this chapter; or

(2) The practice of peer support services by a person who is employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States.

[ 2023 c 469 s 6.]